Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
477E]

FAIR
CREDIT EXTENSION

Section

477E-1 Short title

477E-2 Definitions

477E-3 Prohibited credit discrimination

477E-4 Civil remedies

477E-5 Unfair or deceptive act or practice

477E-6 Inconsistency with federal laws

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next